Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 17.1 Veterans’ Affairs

30-17.1-1.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the support of the veterans’ home in the town of Bristol, any veterans’ cemetery authorized and established by the general assembly, and the assistance of the widows, widowers, and dependent children of deceased veterans, known as the “veterans’ assistance fund”, for the assistance of worthy dependent veterans, and the dependent-worthy families of those veterans who served in the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, and air force of the United States and were honorably discharged from that service, and for such clerical assistance as may be required in connection with the administration of that program; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw an order upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may be from time to time required, upon receipt by the state controller of proper vouchers approved by the director of veterans’ affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.

30-17.1-2.
Powers of office of veterans’ affairs.

The office of veterans’ affairs, in addition to having the control and management of veterans’ affairs, shall have custody of all records inquiring into the needs of worthy veterans and the needs of dependent worthy families of those veterans, residing within the State of Rhode Island, and shall also assist such cases as examination proves worthy of assistance, in such sums of money and by such methods as will, in the judgment of that office, best relieve the needs of worthy applicants for assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.

30-17.1-3.
Oath of officials — Bonds.

All officials appointed under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 24 of this title shall be duly sworn to the faithful performance of their duties. The director of veterans’ affairs may, in the director’s discretion, require of all officials subordinate to the director, bonds for the faithful performance of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.

30-17.1-4.
Veterans’ claims assistance.

Upon request, the director of veterans’ affairs, or his or her designee, shall, in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs of the United States, prepare and present all veterans’ pension and compensation claims qualifying under the provisions of §

42-12-5

. The office of veterans’ affairs shall render this assistance without charge to the claimant for the assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.

30-17.1-5.
Requiring veteran to enter home.

The director of veterans’ affairs, or his or her designee, may, in his or her discretion, require any veteran who has no dependent parents, wife, or children, and who desires assistance as provided in this chapter, to become a resident of the veterans’ home in order to enjoy the benefits of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.

30-17.1-6.
Establishment of the office of veterans’ affairs — Director — Renamed the office of veterans services.

There is hereby established within the executive branch of government an office of veterans’ affairs. The director of the office of veterans’ affairs shall be a person qualified through experience and training and shall be an honorably discharged war veteran of the United States armed forces. The director of the office of veterans’ affairs shall be appointed by and report directly to the governor, but the office shall reside within the department of human services for administrative purposes.

The director of veterans’ affairs shall have all such powers, consistent with law, as are necessary and/or convenient to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and to administer its functions, including, but, not limited to, the power to promulgate and adopt regulations. The director shall have authority to apply for, receive, and administer grants and funds from the federal government and all other public and private entities to accomplish the purposes of the office.

Effective July 1, 2019, the office of veterans’ affairs, as established pursuant to subsection (a), shall be henceforth referred to and renamed as “the office of veterans services” and the director of veterans’ affairs, established pursuant to subsection (a), shall henceforth be referred to and renamed as the “director of veterans services.”

Effective July 1, 2019, all references in the general laws to the office of veterans’ affairs, established pursuant to subsection (a), and to the director of veterans’ affairs, established pursuant to subsection (a), shall be deemed to mean and refer, respectively, to the office of veterans services and the director of veterans services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 5.

30-17.1-7.
Annual report to general assembly.

The director of veterans’ affairs shall report annually, no later than January 31st of each year, to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, the senate president, and house and senate finance committees, setting forth, in detail, the condition of the veterans’ home, any veterans’ cemetery authorized and established by the general assembly, and in general the character of the work of veterans’ affairs, and shall render in the report a faithful account of all moneys received and expended by the director of human services and by the office of veterans’ affairs in the execution of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 24 of this title, excepting the names of persons to whom they have furnished assistance which shall be omitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 41.

30-17.1-8.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that there is a gap in resources and information necessary to effectively support and address the needs of veterans and our state agencies must work together more effectively to collaborate, coordinate, leverage, and ultimately enhance existing state, federal, and private veterans’ services to meet and exceed the needs and expectations of Rhode Island’s veterans and their families.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 215, § 1.

30-17.1-9.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Advisory committee” means the veterans’ services strategic plan advisory committee as established in §

30-17.1-10

.

“Committee” means the veterans’ committee pursuant to the provisions of §

30-17.1-11(c)

.

“State agencies” means state entities responsible for the implementation of services for Rhode Island veterans and their families including:

The office of veterans services;

The Rhode Island public transit authority;

The department of human services;

The office of postsecondary education;

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals;

The department of health;

The office of healthy aging;

The department of business regulation;

The Rhode Island veteran’s court;

The department of labor and training;

The Rhode Island commerce corporation;

The office of the secretary of state; and

The Rhode Island national guard.

“Veterans’ services strategic plan (‘VSSP’)” means the strategic plan as established in §

30-17.1-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 14; P.L. 2017, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 1.

30-17.1-10.
Veterans’ services strategic plan advisory committee established.

There is hereby created a veterans’ services strategic plan advisory committee known as “the Rhode Island veterans’ services strategic plan advisory committee” consisting of fourteen (14) members as follows:

One of whom shall be the director of the office of veterans services, or his or her designee, who shall serve as chairperson;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of human services, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the executive director of the public transit authority, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the postsecondary education commissioner, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the office of healthy aging, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of business regulation, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the chief judge of the district court, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of labor and training, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island commerce corporation, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the secretary of state, or his or her designee;

One of whom shall be the adjutant general of the Rhode Island national guard, or his or her designee; and

One of whom shall be a representative for Rhode Island municipal governments.

Forthwith upon the passage of this chapter, the members of the advisory committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson and organize. Thereafter, the committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson or three (3) members of the advisory committee.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information, documentation, and otherwise to the committee and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the advisory committee to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The office of veterans services is hereby directed to provide suitable quarters and staff for the advisory committee.

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 131, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 1].

The members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16; P.L. 2017, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 1.

30-17.1-11.
The duties of the committee.

The advisory committee, acting through the office of veterans services, shall work in conjunction with the department of human services to develop, maintain, and annually update a five-year (5) statewide veterans’ services strategic plan (“VSSP”) that includes goals and measurable outcomes to ensure that all departments deliver comprehensive services and supports for veterans and their families.

The advisory committee shall conduct an analysis of study toward the development of the “VSSP” that shall include, but not be limited to, the following veterans’ issues:

Living in poverty;

Disability benefits;

Employment and training;

Education;

Family members and caregivers;

Financial planning;

Homelessness;

Legal services;

Long-term care;

Mortuary affairs;

Healthcare;

Transitional assistance; and

Transportation.

The chairperson of the committee shall consult regularly with veterans and community groups that represent diverse interests and viewpoints and the federal department of veterans’ affairs, to receive input on all matters pertaining to the preparation or implementation of the veterans’ services strategic plan.

The “VSSP” shall:

Be based upon comprehensive data gained through open and transparent engagement of veterans’ stakeholders;

Produce veteran-centric policies and procedures informed by forward looking planning;

Realistically assess resource adequacy and capabilities delivered;

Ensure that existing resources are aligned to mission critical objectives;

Complement, as well as leverage, existing U.S. Veterans’ Administration programs and best practices;

Foster state, federal, and private partnerships that seamlessly deliver exceptional services to the state’s veteran population; and

More effectively coordinate the delivery of veterans’ services to all current and future veterans in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16; P.L. 2017, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 1.

30-17.1-12.
Meeting and reporting requirements for the advisory committee.

The advisory committee shall meet regularly on an annual basis and at the call of the chairperson or three (3) committee members.

The advisory committee shall provide a copy of the veterans’ services strategic plan “VSSP” to the senate president, speaker of the house, senate fiscal advisor, and house fiscal advisor one year after the amendment of this act.

The advisory committee shall report annually to the governor and the general assembly, no later than April of each year, on the progress made in achieving the goals and objectives set forth and any other pertinent information. A progress update of the “VSSP” in the office of veterans services annual report will satisfy this requirement.

The advisory committee shall update the “VSSP” every five (5) years and provide a copy of the plan to the senate president, speaker of the house, and senate and house fiscal advisors.

The advisory committee shall be subject to the provisions of §

38-2-1

et seq., Access to Public Records Act, and §

42-46-1

et seq., Open Meetings Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 1.

30-17.1-13.
Veterans’ “pocket guide” and online resource application.

Contingent upon funding:

The director of the office of veterans’ affairs shall produce and annually update a comprehensive “pocket guide of veterans’ services.” This document shall be a concise yet thorough compendium of the benefits and services available to veterans in Rhode Island.

Additionally, the director of veterans’ affairs shall develop and maintain a veterans’ online resource application of this information.

The director of veterans’ affairs is hereby authorized to accept grants and donations for this project.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 16.